Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.200

Entity filing requirements.

(1) To be filed by the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter, an entity filing must be received by the secretary of state, comply with this chapter, and satisfy the following:

(a) The entity filing must be required or permitted by Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW.

(b) The entity filing must be delivered in a tangible medium unless and to the extent the secretary of state permits electronic delivery of entity filings pursuant to RCW 23.95.115(2).

(c) The words in the entity filing must be in English, and numbers must be in Arabic or Roman numerals, but the name of the entity need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals.

(d) The entity filing must be executed by or on behalf of a person authorized or required under this chapter or the entity's organic law to execute the filing.

(e) The entity filing must state the name and capacity, if any, of each individual who executed it, on behalf of either the individual or the person authorized or required to execute the filing, but need not contain a seal, attestation, acknowledgment, or verification.

(2) When an entity filing is delivered to the secretary of state for filing, any fee required under this chapter and any fee, interest, or penalty required to be paid under this chapter or law other than this chapter must be paid in a manner permitted by the secretary of state or by that law.

(3) The secretary of state may require that an entity filing delivered in a tangible medium be accompanied by an identical or conformed copy.

(4) A record filed under this chapter may be executed by an individual acting in a valid representative capacity.

[ 2020 c 57 s 30; 2015 c 176 s 1201.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.